Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 3. Regional Development

§§ 2771-2778.
Repealed.
1967, No. 334 (Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 23, 1968.

§ 2779.
Interstate development region; purpose; region; State aid.

It is also the purpose of this act to assist the local communities and regions within the State, and those communities and regions combined with communities or regions of a neighboring state, in carrying out an overall economic development program ensuring the best possible implementation of approved plans for the full development of physical and human resources of the individual communities within the region.

A region is also five or more municipalities within the State or combined with a neighboring state approved by the State Central Planning Office as a logical region to undertake a comprehensive regional planning program in compliance with the overall State comprehensive plan prepared by the Central Planning Office.

In the case of an interstate regional development commission, the financial assistance from the State shall be restricted to 50 per cent of the assessment of annual operating expenses of the cooperating Vermont municipalities.

HISTORY:

1967, No. 99

, § 3, eff. April 13, 1967.